Washington statutes.
RCW 4.18.901

Application of chapter—Existing and future claims.

This chapter applies to claims:

(1) Accruing after July 24, 1983; or

(2) Asserted in a civil action or proceeding more than one year after July 24, 1983, but it does not revive a claim barred before July 24, 1983.

[ 1983 c 152 s 5.]